Washington statutes.
RCW 18.39.260

Prearrangement contracts—Certificates of registration required—Exception.

A funeral establishment shall not enter into prearrangement funeral service contracts in this state unless the funeral establishment has obtained a certificate of registration issued by the board and such certificate is then in force.

Certificates of registration shall be maintained by funeral establishments and the funeral establishment shall comply with all requirements related to the sale of prearrangement contracts until all obligations have been fulfilled. The board may, for just cause, release a funeral establishment from specific registration or reporting requirements.

[ 1989 c 390 s 5; 1986 c 259 s 67; 1982 c 66 s 4.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 259: See note following RCW 18.130.010.

Effective dates—Transfer of records, files, and pending business—Savings—1982 c 66: See notes following RCW 18.39.240.